Utah statutes.
77-18-5.   Reports by courts and prosecuting attorneys to Board of Pardons and Parole.

In cases where an indeterminate sentence is imposed, the judge and prosecuting attorney may, within 30 days, mail a statement to the Board of Pardons and Parole setting forth the term for which the prisoner ought to be imprisoned together with any information which might aid the board in passing on the application for termination or commutation of the sentence or for parole or pardon.



Amended by Chapter 13, 1994 General Session

